dev/wikt.full-form.pl.dix
    <pardef n="po/t__n_mi">
      <e><p>          <l>t</l><r>t<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>t</l><r>t<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>tu</l><r>t<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>towi</l><r>t<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>cie</l><r>t<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>tem</l><r>t<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>cie</l><r>t<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>(ty)</l><r>t<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>(ty)</l><r>t<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>(tów)</l><r>t<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>(tom)</l><r>t<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>(tach)</l><r>t<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>(tami)</l><r>t<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>(ty)</l><r>t<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kamie/ń__n_mi">
      <e><p>          <l>ń</l><r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ń</l><r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>nia</l><r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>niowi</l><r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>niu</l><r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>niem</l><r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>niu</l><r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>nie</l><r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>nie</l><r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ni</l><r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>niom</l><r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>niach</l><r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>niami</l><r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>nie</l><r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="rad__n_mi">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>u</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>owi</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>em</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>zie</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="jele/ń__n_ma">
      <e><p>          <l>ń</l><r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>nia</l><r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>nia</l><r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>niowi</l><r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>niu</l><r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>niem</l><r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>niu</l><r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>nie</l><r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>nie</l><r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ni</l><r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>niom</l><r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>niach</l><r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>niami</l><r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>nie</l><r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="okr/ąg__n_mi">
      <e><p>          <l>ąg</l><r>ąg<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ąg</l><r>ąg<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ęgu</l><r>ąg<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ęgowi</l><r>ąg<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ęgu</l><r>ąg<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ęgiem</l><r>ąg<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ęgu</l><r>ąg<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ęgi</l><r>ąg<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ęgi</l><r>ąg<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ęgów</l><r>ąg<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ęgom</l><r>ąg<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ęgach</l><r>ąg<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ęgami</l><r>ąg<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ęgi</l><r>ąg<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kur/wa__n_f">
      <e><p>          <l>wa</l><r>wa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>wę</l><r>wa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>wy</l><r>wa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>wie</l><r>wa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>wie</l><r>wa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>wą</l><r>wa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>wo</l><r>wa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>wy</l><r>wa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>wy</l><r>wa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ew</l><r>wa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>wom</l><r>wa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>wach</l><r>wa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>wami</l><r>wa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>wy</l><r>wa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="bitwa"><i>bit</i><par n="kur/wa__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="jeleń"><i>jele</i><par n="jele/ń__n_ma"/></e>
    <e lm="kamień"><i>kamie</i><par n="kamie/ń__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="kurwa"><i>kur</i><par n="kur/wa__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="okrąg"><i>okr</i><par n="okr/ąg__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="pierścień"><i>pierście</i><par n="kamie/ń__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="pochwa"><i>poch</i><par n="kur/wa__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="pot"><i>po</i><par n="po/t__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="rad"><i>rad</i><par n="rad__n_mi"/></e>
